Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3524
Cease and desist order; injunction.

The director may issue an order and notice of hearing instructing a motor vehicle service contract provider to cease and desist from selling or offering for sale motor vehicle service contracts if the director determines that the provider has failed to comply with the Motor Vehicle Service Contract Reimbursement Insurance Act. Upon the failure of a motor vehicle service contract provider to obey a cease and desist order issued by the director, the director may give notice in writing of the failure to the Attorney General who may commence an action against the provider to enjoin the provider from selling or offering for sale motor vehicle service contracts until the provider complies with the act. The district court may issue the injunction.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 96.